Vermont, session 2025-2026, H707.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. § 13 is amended to read:
§ 13. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 2 of 7
(11) “Principal place of business” means the office location designated
by the licensee for the purposes of substantial equivalency mobility and
reciprocity.
* * *
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. § 71a is amended to read:
§ 71a. LICENSE BY EXAMINATION
(a) A license as a “certified public accountant” shall be granted by the
Board to any person:
(1) who is of good character;
(2) who completes any one of the following requirements for education
and experience:
(A) a post-baccalaureate degree from a college or university
recognized by the Board with a concentration in accounting or an equivalent
and one year of experience in public accounting, meeting the requirements
prescribed by Board rule;
(B) 150 or more semester hours of college credit at a college or
university recognized by the Board, including a baccalaureate degree and a
minimum of 42 semester hours of accounting, auditing, and related subjects as
the Board determines to be appropriate, and one year of experience in public
accounting, meeting the requirements prescribed by Board rule or other
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 3 of 7
experience or employment that the Board in its discretion considers
substantially equivalent; and or
(C) a baccalaureate degree from a college or university recognized by
the Board with a concentration in accounting or an equivalent and two years of
experience in public accounting, meeting the requirements prescribed by Board
rule; and
(3) who has passed the examination required under subsection (b) of this
section.
(b) The Board shall administer an examination using a nationally
recognized uniform certified public accountants’ examination and advisory
grading service.
(c) An applicant who has not yet completed a baccalaureate degree may sit
for the exam upon the completion of 120 semester hours at an institution
recognized by the Board, including a minimum of 30 semester hours of
accounting, auditing, and related subjects as the Board determines to be
appropriate.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. § 72b is amended to read:
§ 72b. LICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT
Without requiring an examination, the Board shall issue an appropriate
license to a public accountant who is licensed or certified under the laws of
another state:
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 4 of 7
(1) with education, examination, and experience requirements that the
Board considers to be substantially equal comparable to those of this State; or
(2)(A) upon a showing that the applicant has had five years of
experience in the practice of public accountancy or meets equivalent
requirements prescribed by the Board by rule within the 10 years immediately
preceding the application; and
(B) has fulfilled the requirements of continuing education or
continuing professional competence programs that would have been applicable
under subsection 75(b) of this title.
Sec. 4. 26 V.S.A. § 74c is amended to read:
§ 74c. SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENCY MOBILITY
(a) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this State shall
be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this State’s
requirements and shall have the privileges of licensure of this State, without
the need to obtain a license under section 72b of this title, if the individual:
(1) holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from a any state
the Board determines has licensure requirements substantially equivalent to the
requirements of the AICPA/NASBA Uniform Accountancy Act; or
(2) holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state,
and the individual obtains verification from the NASBA National Qualification
Appraisal Service that the individual’s qualifications are substantially
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 5 of 7
equivalent to the licensure requirements of the AICPA/NASBA Uniform
Accountancy Act. An individual who passed the uniform CPA examination
and holds a valid license issued by any state prior to January 1, 2012 shall be
exempt from the education requirements of subdivision 5(c)(2) of the Uniform
Accountancy Act for purposes of this section. has passed the uniform CPA
examination and has met any one of the following requirements for education
and experience in accordance with rules adopted by the Board:
(A) a post-baccalaureate degree from a college or university with a
concentration in accounting or an equivalent and one year of experience in
public accounting;
(B) 150 or more semester hours of college credit at a college or
university, including a baccalaureate degree and a minimum of 42 semester
hours of accounting, auditing, and related subjects, and one year of experience
in public accounting; or
(C) a baccalaureate degree from a college or university with a
concentration in accounting or an equivalent and two years of experience in
public accounting.
* * *
(g) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this State, who
holds a valid active license as a certified public accountant from any state, and
who, as of December 31, 2024, had practice privileges in this State under this
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 6 of 7
section shall continue to have all the privileges of licensees in this State
without the need to obtain a license under section 71a of this title, pursuant to
all other requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 5. 26 V.S.A. § 75 is amended to read:
§ 75. RENEWAL
(a) Public accountant licenses and firm registrations under this chapter shall
be renewed every two years on payment of the required fee.
(b) As a condition of renewal of a license as a public accountant, the Board
may require that the licensee establish that he or she the licensee has satisfied
continuing education requirements established by Board rule.
(c) The Board may by rule require, on either a uniform or a random basis,
as a condition to renewal of firm registrations under section 74 of this title, that
applicants undergo peer reviews conducted no not more frequently than once
every three years in such manner and producing such satisfactory result as the
Board may specify,; provided, however, that any such requirement:
(1) shall be adopted reasonably in advance of the time when it is first
required to be met; and
(2) shall include a reasonable provision for compliance by an applicant’s
showing that the applicant has undergone a satisfactory peer review performed
for other purposes that was substantially equivalent comparable to peer
VT LEG #386113 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.707
2026 Page 7 of 7
reviews generally required pursuant to this section, and completion of such
review was within the three years immediately preceding the renewal period.
(d) Information submitted for peer reviews is exempt from public
disclosure under 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(3) and (6).
(e) If a licensee fails to renew within 10 years of following the license
lapsing, the licensee must file a new application for licensure and satisfy the
initial licensure requirements of the Board in order to obtain a license.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386113 v.1